Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.090

Cancel.

"Cancel," in all its forms, means invalidation indefinitely.

[ 1979 c 61 s 1; 1961 c 12 s 46.04.090. Prior: 1959 c 49 s 10; prior: (i) 1943 c 153 s 1, part; 1937 c 188 s 1, part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 6312-1, part. (ii) 1937 c 189 s 1, part; RRS s 6360-1, part.]